Utah statutes.
61-6-12.   Dissenter's rights.
(1)  Unless otherwise provided in a corporation's articles of incorporation or
bylaws before a control share acquisition has occurred, in the event control
shares acquired in a control share acquisition are accorded full voting rights
and the acquiring person has acquired control shares with a majority or more
of all voting power, all shareholders of the issuing public corporation have
dissenter's rights as provided in this chapter.
(2)  As soon as practicable after such events have occurred, the board of
directors shall cause a notice to be sent to all shareholders of the
corporation advising them of the facts and that they have  dissenter's rights
to receive the fair value of their shares under Sections 16-10a-1301 through
16-10a-1331.
(3)  As used in this section, "fair value" means a value not less than the
highest price paid per share by the acquiring person in the control share
acquisition.
